Utah statutes.
78B-5-620.   Calibration certificates for breathalizers.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Breathalizer" means any device used by a law enforcement agency which
utilizes a person's breath to estimate blood alcohol content.
(b)  "Calibration" means the manual setting of specific levels on a
breathalizer by a person trained to reset the machine to insure as accurate
results as possible.
(c)  "Certificate of calibration" means the document issued by the person who
calibrates a breathalizer, attesting to the accuracy of the machine.
(d)  "Department" means the Department of Public Safety created in Section
53-1-103.
(e)  "Digitize" means to convert content from a tangible, analog form into a
digital electronic representation of that content.
(2)  The department may digitize and post the digital format of certificates
of calibration on its website in a secure location not available to the
public.
(3)  The secure location shall be available to courts and local prosecutors'
offices for use in actions in which it is alleged a party was intoxicated and
a law enforcement officer required the party to submit to a breathalizer test.
(4)  The department shall make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3,
Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act:
(a)  to provide a method for insuring the accuracy of the certificates on the
website; and
(b)  providing for an attestation to the authenticity of the certificate upon
download by a prosecutor or court.
